Massachusetts, session 194th, H777.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 10, as appearing in the 2020 Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting
after section 78 the following section:-
Section 79. The office of the state treasurer shall develop and periodically review and
update model curriculum to support seniors’ financial literacy and stability, in consultation with
the executive office of elder affairs, the Massachusetts Councils on Aging and AARP
Massachusetts.
of 1